Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-226
Exemption, how construed.

The exemption provided by sections 39-223 to 39-225 shall be in addition to the exemption provided by section 39-219.

Laws 1978, LB 534, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 39-1320.15;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 20.